Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-237
Health regulations; nuisances; abatement; slaughterhouses; stockyards; location.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to regulate in the area which is within the corporate limits of the city and its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction in order to (1) secure the general health, (2) provide rules for the prevention, abatement, and removal of nuisances, including the pollution of air and water, and (3) make and prescribe regulations for the construction, location, and regulation of all slaughterhouses, stockyards, warehouses, commercial feed lots, stables, or other places where offensive matter is kept or is likely to accumulate.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXXVIII, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 4448;

Laws 1919, c. 40, § 1, p. 124;

C.S.1922, § 3832;

C.S.1929, § 15-235;

R.S.1943, § 15-237;

Laws 1967, c. 57, § 2, p. 194;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 54.

Mosquitoes, flies, or other insects, nuisance, abatement, see sections 71-2917 and 71-2918.